incubator/apertium-ga-gv.gv.dix
    <pardef n="/chiu__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>chiu</l>
          <r>chiu<s n="adj"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>s'chee</l>
          <r>chiu<s n="adj"/><s n="comp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="/çheh__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>çheh</l>
          <r>çheh<s n="adj"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>schoe</l>
          <r>çheh<s n="adj"/><s n="comp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="doo__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="adj"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ass__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="adv"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- Prepositions -->

    <pardef n="cur__pr">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="pr"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ayn/s__pr">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>s</l>
          <r>s<s n="pr"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ym</l>
          <r>s<s n="pr"/><j/>indirect<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>yd</l>
          <r>s<s n="pr"/><j/>indirect<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r>s<s n="pr"/><j/>indirect<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jee</l>
          <r>s<s n="pr"/><j/>indirect<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>dooin</l>
          <r>s<s n="pr"/><j/>indirect<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>diu</l>
          <r>s<s n="pr"/><j/>indirect<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>daue</l>
          <r>s<s n="pr"/><j/>indirect<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ass__pr">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="pr"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ym</l>
          <r><s n="pr"/><j/>indirect<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>yd</l>
          <r><s n="pr"/><j/>indirect<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jeh</l>
          <r><s n="pr"/><j/>indirect<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jee</l>
          <r><s n="pr"/><j/>indirect<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>dooin</l>
          <r><s n="pr"/><j/>indirect<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>diu</l>
          <r><s n="pr"/><j/>indirect<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>daue</l>
          <r><s n="pr"/><j/>indirect<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>


    <pardef n="/da__pr">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>da</l>
          <r>da<s n="pr"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>dou</l>
          <r>da<s n="pr"/><j/>indirect<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>dhyt</l>
          <r>da<s n="pr"/><j/>indirect<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>da</l>
          <r>da<s n="pr"/><j/>indirect<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jee</l>
          <r>da<s n="pr"/><j/>indirect<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>dooin</l>
          <r>da<s n="pr"/><j/>indirect<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>diu</l>
          <r>da<s n="pr"/><j/>indirect<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>daue</l>
          <r>da<s n="pr"/><j/>indirect<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="/er__pr">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>er</l>
          <r>er<s n="pr"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>orrym</l>
          <r>er<s n="pr"/><j/>indirect<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ort</l>
          <r>er<s n="pr"/><j/>indirect<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>er</l>
          <r>er<s n="pr"/><j/>indirect<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>urree</l>
          <r>er<s n="pr"/><j/>indirect<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>orrin</l>
          <r>er<s n="pr"/><j/>indirect<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>erriu</l>
          <r>er<s n="pr"/><j/>indirect<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>orroo</l>
          <r>er<s n="pr"/><j/>indirect<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>


    <pardef n="/ec__pr">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ec</l>
          <r>ec<s n="pr"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>aym</l>
          <r>ec<s n="pr"/><j/>indirect<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ayd</l>
          <r>ec<s n="pr"/><j/>indirect<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>echey</l>
          <r>ec<s n="pr"/><j/>indirect<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eck</l>
          <r>ec<s n="pr"/><j/>indirect<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ain</l>
          <r>ec<s n="pr"/><j/>indirect<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eu</l>
          <r>ec<s n="pr"/><j/>indirect<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>oc</l>
          <r>ec<s n="pr"/><j/>indirect<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="ec"><i/><par n="/ec__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="ass"><i>ass</i><par n="ass__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="ayns"><i>ayn</i><par n="ayn/s__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="da"><i/><par n="/da__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="er"><i/><par n="/er__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="cur"><i>cur</i><par n="cur__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="chiu"><i/><par n="/chiu__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="çheh"><i/><par n="/çheh__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="ass"><i>ass</i><par n="ass__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="çhelleeragh"><i>çhelleeragh</i><par n="ass__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="doaltattym"><i>doaltattym</i><par n="ass__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="kiart dy liooar"><i>kiart<b/>dy<b/>liooar</i><par n="ass__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="mie dy liooar"><i>mie<b/>dy<b/>liooar</i><par n="ass__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="myr shoh"><i>myr<b/>shoh</i><par n="ass__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="myr shen"><i>myr<b/>shen</i><par n="ass__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="dy-mie"><i>dy-mie</i><par n="ass__adv"/></e>
